el: Επίπεδο παίκτη επιστομίου κλαρινέτου: Προχωρημένο/επαγγελματικό; Αρχάριο/μαθητικό; Μεσαίο; Καθολικό; Άλλο
it: Livello del suonatore di bocchino per clarinetto: Avanzato/Professionista; Principiante/Studente; Intermedio; Universale; Altro
pt-PT: Nível de tocador de boquilha de clarinete: Avançado/profissional; Iniciante/estudante; Intermédio; Universal; Outro
sv: Klarinettmunstyckets spelarnivå: Avancerad/professionell; Nybörjare/elev; Medel; Universell; Annan
hu: Klarinétfúvóka zenész szintje: Haladó/professzionális; Kezdő/tanuló; Középhaladó; Univerzális; Egyéb
nl: Klarinetmondstuk spelersniveau: Gevorderd/professioneel; Beginner/student; Gemiddeld; Universeel; Anders
ja: クラリネットマウスピースプレイヤーレベル: 上級/プロフェッショナル; 初心者/学生; 中級; ユニバーサル; その他
bg-BG: Ниво на изпълнителя за мундщук за кларинет: Напреднали/професионалисти; Начинаещи/ученици; Средно напреднали; Универсален; Друго
tr: Klarnet beki çalıcı seviyesi: İleri seviye/profesyonel; Başlangıç/öğrenci; Orta seviye; Evrensel; Diğer
ro-RO: Nivel interpretului la muștiucul clarinetului: Avansat/profesionist; Începător/elev; Intermediar; Universal; Altele
cs: Úroveň hráče na náustek pro klarinet: Pokročilý/profesionální; Začátečník/student; Mírně pokročilý; Univerzální; Jiné
ko: 클라리넷 마우스피스 연주자 수준: 고급/전문가용; 초보자/학생용; 중급자용; 공용; 기타
fi: Klarinetin suukappaleen soittajan taso: Edistynyt/ammattilainen; Aloittelija/opiskelija; Keskitaso; Yleinen; Muu
pt-BR: Nível de tocador da boquilha do clarinete: Avançado/profissional; Iniciante/estudante; Intermediário; Universal; Outro
es: Nivel de experiencia del intérprete compatible con la boquilla de clarinete: Avanzado/profesional; Principiante/estudiante; Intermedio; Universal; Otro
ru: Уровень исполнителя для мундштука кларнета: Продвинутый / профессиональный; Начинающий / ученический; Средний уровень; Универсальный; Другой
de: Spielniveau des Klarinettenmundstücks: Fortgeschritten/professionell; Anfänger/Schüler; Mittelstufe; Universal; Sonstige
vi: Trình độ người chơi của ống ngậm kèn clarinet: Nâng cao/chuyên nghiệp; Người mới bắt đầu/học viên; Trung cấp; Phổ thông; Khác
hr-HR: Razina svirača usnika za klarinet: Napredni/profesionalni; Početni/učenički; Srednji; Univerzalni; Ostalo
sl-SI: Raven igralca ustnika za klarinet: Napredni/profesionalci; Začetniki/učenci; Srednja stopnja; Univerzalno; Drugo
pl: Poziom zaawansowania gracza ustnika klarnetu: Zaawansowany / profesjonalny; Początkujący / uczeń; Średnio zaawansowany; Uniwersalny; Inny
th: ระดับผู้เล่นสำหรับปากเป่าคลาริเน็ต: ระดับสูง/มืออาชีพ; ผู้เริ่มต้น/นักเรียน; ระดับกลาง; ครอบจักรวาล; อื่นๆ
nb: Klarinettmunnstykke-spillernivå: Avansert / profesjonell; Nybegynner / student; Viderekommen; Universell; Annet
fr: Niveau de joueur du bec de clarinette: Avancé/professionnel; Débutant/étudiant; Intermédiaire; Universel; Autre
en: Clarinet mouthpiece player level: Advanced/professional; Beginner/student; Intermediate; Universal; Other
zh-CN: 单簧管笛头适用水平: 高级/专业; 初学者/学生; 中级; 通用; 其他
da: Tiltænkt spillerniveau for klarinetmundstykke: Avanceret/professionel; Begynder/elev; Mellemniveau; Universel; Andet
lt-LT: Klarneto kandiklio grotuvo lygis: Pažengusiems / profesionalams; Pradedantiesiems / mokiniams; Vidutinio lygio; Universalus; Kita
zh-TW: 單簧管吹嘴演奏者程度: 進階/專業; 初學/學生; 中階; 通用; 其他
sk-SK: Úroveň hráča pri náustku na klarinet: Pokročilý/profesionál; Začiatočník/študent; Mierne pokročilý; Univerzálny; Iné